Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-7-123. Certified nurse practitioners — Drug prescriptions — Temporary certificate — Rules and regulations.

The board shall issue a certificate of fitness to nurse practitioners who meet the qualifications, competencies, training, education and experience, pursuant to § 63-7-207(14), sufficient to prepare such persons to write and sign prescriptions and/or issue drugs within the limitations and provisions of § 63-1-132.

A nurse who has been issued a certificate of fitness as a nurse practitioner pursuant to § 63-7-207 and this section shall file a notice with the board, containing the name of the nurse practitioner, the name of the licensed physician collaborating with the nurse practitioner who has control and responsibility for prescriptive services rendered by the nurse practitioner, and a copy of the formulary describing the categories of legend drugs to be prescribed and/or issued by the nurse practitioner. The nurse practitioner shall be responsible for updating this information.

The nurse practitioner who holds a certificate of fitness shall be authorized to prescribe and/or issue controlled substances listed in Schedules II, III, IV, and V of title 39, chapter 17, part 4, upon joint adoption of physician collaboration rules concerning controlled substances pursuant to subsection (d).

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2)(A), a nurse practitioner shall not prescribe Schedules II, III, and IV controlled substances unless such prescription is specifically authorized by the formulary or expressly approved after consultation with the collaborating physician before the initial issuance of the prescription or dispensing of the medication.

A nurse practitioner who had been issued a certificate of fitness may only prescribe or issue a Schedule II or III opioid listed on the formulary for a maximum of a non-refillable, thirty-day course of treatment unless specifically approved after consultation with the collaborating physician before the initial issuance of the prescription or dispensing of the medication. This subdivision (b)(2)(C) shall not apply to prescriptions issued in a hospital, a nursing home licensed under title 68, or inpatient facilities licensed under title 33.

Any prescription written and signed or drug issued by a nurse practitioner under collaboration with and the control of a collaborating physician shall be deemed to be that of the nurse practitioner. Every prescription issued by a nurse practitioner pursuant to this section shall be entered in the medical records of the patient and shall be written on a preprinted prescription pad bearing the name, address, and telephone number of the collaborating physician and of the nurse practitioner, and the nurse practitioner shall sign each prescription so written. Where the preprinted prescription pad contains the names of more than one (1) physician, the nurse practitioner shall indicate on the prescription which of those physicians is the nurse practitioner's primary collaborating physician by placing a checkmark beside or a circle around the name of that physician.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by a nurse practitioner who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing nurse practitioner, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing nurse practitioner must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by a nurse practitioner in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by a nurse practitioner who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription order. The typed or computer-generated prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing nurse practitioner, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the typed or computer-generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing nurse practitioner must sign the typed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by a nurse practitioner in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a nurse practitioner from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (b)(3)(E)(i) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

The nurse practitioner shall maintain a copy of the protocol the nurse practitioner is using at the nurse practitioner's practice location and shall make the protocol available upon request by the board of nursing, the board of medical examiners or authorized agents of either board.

An advanced practice registered nurse with a certificate of fitness issued pursuant to this chapter, who provides services in a free clinic as defined in § 63-6-703 or engages in the voluntary provision of healthcare services as defined in § 63-6-703, may arrange for required personal review of the nurse's charts by a collaborating physician in the office or practice site of the physician or remotely via HIPAA-compliant electronic means rather than at the site of the clinic. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(5), “HIPAA-compliant” means that the entity has implemented technical policies and procedures for electronic information systems that meet the requirements of 45 CFR 164.312.

An advanced practice registered nurse with a certificate of fitness issued pursuant to this chapter, who provides services in a community mental health center as defined in § 33-1-101, may arrange for the required personal review of the advanced practice registered nurse's charts by a collaborating physician, with the same authority to render prescriptive services that the nurse practitioner is authorized to render, in the office or practice site of the physician, or the required visit by a collaborating physician to any remote site, or both, via HIPAA-compliant electronic means rather than at the site of the clinic. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(6), “HIPAA-compliant” means that the entity has implemented technical policies and procedures for electronic information systems that meet the requirements of 45 C.F.R. § 164.312.

The board may issue a temporary certificate of fitness to a registered nurse who:

Is licensed to practice in Tennessee;

Has a master's degree in a nursing clinical specialty area with preparation in specialized practitioner skills that includes three (3) quarter hours of pharmacology instruction or its equivalent; and

Has applied for examination and/or is awaiting examination results for national certification as a first-time examinee in an appropriate nursing specialty area.

Such temporary certificate shall remain valid until the examination results are obtained. The holder of a temporary certificate issued under this subsection (c) who has not received the results of the examination shall work only under the supervision and control of a certified nurse practitioner or physician.

Any rules that purport to regulate the collaboration of nurse practitioners with physicians shall be jointly adopted by the board of medical examiners and the board of nursing.

Acts 1980, ch. 851, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-760; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 9; 1992, ch. 822, § 1; 1994, ch. 569, § 2; 1995, ch. 358, § 1; 1996, ch. 659, § 2; 1997, ch. 507, § 2; 1998, ch. 842, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 259, § 1; 2004, ch. 678, § 9; 2005, ch. 12, § 4; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 5, 9; 2010, ch. 795, §§ 6, 17; 2013, ch. 74, § 5; 2013, ch. 396, § 1; 2016, ch. 769, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, § 12; 2017, ch. 334, §§ 2-5; 2018, ch. 883, § 6; 2019, ch. 183, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 507, § 4 provides that nothing in (b)(2) shall apply to the practice of nurse anesthesia.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004.”

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute nonprescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 9 provided that §§ 1-7 of the act shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the physician or other person authorized to write prescriptions, writes the order into the hospital medical record and the patient or patient's agent or representative never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home, or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.

For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), substituted “collaborating physician” for “supervising physician” throughout, substituted “licensed physician collaborating with the nurse practitioner who has control” for “licensed physician having supervision, control” in (1), substituted “physician collaboration rules” for “physician supervisory rules” in (2)(A), and substituted “nurse practitioner under collaboration with and the control of a collaborating physician” for “nurse practitioner under the supervision and control of a supervising physician” in (3)(A); and substituted “regulate the collaboration of nurse practitioners with physicians” for “regulate the supervision of nurse practitioners by physicians” in (d).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, deleted former (b)(3)(F) which read: “Any written, printed or computer-generated prescription order for a Schedule II controlled substance prepared by an advanced practice registered nurse who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be printed or typed as a separate prescription order. The written, printed or computer-generated prescription order must contain all information otherwise required by law. The prescribing advanced practice registered nurse must sign the written, printed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued.”

The 2019 amendment added (b)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 12. January 1, 2019; provided that for rulemaking purposes the act took effect May 3, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 183, § 3. April 23, 2019.

Cross-References. Certified nurse practitioners' prescription and drug authorization powers, § 63-7-207.

Issuance of oral contraceptives and drugs relating to sexually transmitted diseases, by professional nurse, § 63-7-124.

Law Reviews.

Health Professionals' Access to Hospitals: A Retrospective and Prospective Analysis, 34 Vand. L. Rev. 1161 (1981).

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

Attorney General Opinions. Prescriptions by nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist; applicability of prescribing privileges to all categories of advanced practice nurse. OAG 10-22, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (3/1/10).

63-7-124. Authority to issue oral contraceptives and drugs relating to sexually transmitted diseases.

Notwithstanding former §§ 63-1-132(c) [repealed] and 63-7-123, a professional nurse, licensed pursuant to §§ 63-7-104 — 63-7-107, who is employed by a primary health care center established under § 68-1-701, that receives fifty percent (50%) or more of its family planning funds from funds distributed by the department of health, has the authority to issue, in the same manner as is currently permitted the department or local health departments under § 63-10-205:

Oral contraceptives, excluding abortifacients; and

Drugs relating to sexually transmitted diseases.

A drug issued under this section shall be issued in accordance with any protocols or standards established by the department for the use of such drug.

No drugs as provided in this section shall be issued unless a physician has examined the patient for the condition for which such drugs are issued; provided, that this requirement does not supersede any protocol under which a nurse practitioner is rendering service to a patient pursuant to § 63-6-204 or § 63-7-123.

Acts 1990, ch. 858, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-132(c), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1043, § 7, effective June 11, 2010.

63-7-125. Confidentiality.

The confidential communications between a client and a registered nurse who is nationally certified as a specialist in psychiatric and mental health nursing and who is practicing in that specialty are considered equivalent to the confidential communications between a patient and a licensed physician practicing as a psychiatrist, under laws addressing privilege and confidentiality and shall have the same protections accorded to patient-psychiatrist communications under § 24-1-207.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent disclosure of confidential communications in proceedings arising under title 37, chapter 1, part 4, concerning mandatory child abuse reports, or in proceedings arising under title 71, chapter 6, part 1, concerning mandatory adult abuse reports.

Acts 1995, ch. 271, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-7-126. Advanced practice registered nurses.

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means a registered nurse with a master's degree or higher in a nursing specialty and national specialty certification as a nurse practitioner, nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife or clinical nurse specialist.

Nurse practitioners, nurse anesthetists, nurse midwives and clinical nurse specialists holding such education and practice credentials shall apply to the board for a certificate to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse, including authorization to use the title “advanced practice registered nurse” or the abbreviation “APRN.” No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation or any other words, letters or signs to indicate that the person using the same is an advanced practice registered nurse.

An applicant for a certificate to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse shall pay an initial fee as set by the board as well as a biennial renewal fee as set by the board.

A nurse practitioner, nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife or clinical nurse specialist who holds a Tennessee registered nurse license in good standing and current national specialty certification in the advanced practice specialty shall be eligible for a certificate to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse on May 22, 2002, and shall be exempt from the requirement of a master's degree or higher in the nursing specialty if licensed in Tennessee and holding national specialty certification prior to July 1, 2005. Notwithstanding the previous requirements, a nurse anesthetist shall be eligible for a certificate to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse if the nurse anesthetist graduated prior to January 1, 1999, from a nurse anesthesia educational program approved by the American Association of Nurse Anesthetists Council on Accreditation.

With the exception of subsection (f), nothing in this section shall be interpreted to alter or change the current law as it existed on May 22, 2002, regarding prescriptive rights, supervision or scope of practice for nurse anesthetists regulated under this title, nurse midwives as described in § 56-7-2407, clinical nurse specialists or certified nurse practitioners as defined in § 63-7-123. Nor shall anything in this section be interpreted to allow any board or other entity to promulgate rules that would alter or change the law as it existed on May 22, 2002, regarding such prescriptive rights, supervision or scope of practice.

An advanced practice registered nurse shall only perform invasive procedures involving any portion of the spine, spinal cord, sympathetic nerves of the spine or block of major peripheral nerves of the spine in any setting not licensed under title 68, chapter 11 under the direct supervision of a Tennessee physician licensed pursuant to chapter 6 or 9 of this title who is actively practicing spinal injections and has current privileges to do so at a facility licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11. The direct supervision provided by a physician in this subsection (f) shall only be offered by a physician who meets the qualifications established in § 63-6-244(a)(1) or (a)(3) or § 63-9-121(a)(1) or (a)(3). For purposes of this subsection (f), “direct supervision” is defined as being physically present in the same building as the advanced practice registered nurse at the time the invasive procedure is performed. This subsection (f) shall not apply to an advanced practice registered nurse performing major joint injections except sacroiliac injections, or to performing soft tissue injections or epidurals for surgical anesthesia or labor analgesia in unlicensed settings.

Acts 2002, ch. 768, § 1; 2003, ch. 111, § 1; 2008, ch. 782, § 1; 2012, ch. 961, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 980, §§ 13-15.

Attorney General Opinions. Prescriptions by nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist; applicability of prescribing privileges to all categories of advanced practice nurse. OAG 10-22, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (3/1/10).

63-7-127. Medication aides.

As used in this section, “medication aide” means an individual who administers medications under the general supervision of a licensed registered or practical nurse pursuant to this section. During the course of administering medication, a medication aide shall not be assigned any other nonmedication administration duties. A medication aide shall not be prohibited from responding, as appropriate, to an emergency.

Any nursing home or assisted care living facility licensed pursuant to title 68 or a Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) as defined in § 56-2-121(b) may use one (1) or more medication aides to administer medications, as set forth in this section, to its patients; provided, that each and every individual used as a medication aide shall hold a current, valid medication aide certificate issued by the board of nursing under this section.

When carrying out their responsibilities under this section, medication aides shall wear a name tag visible to others that displays the designation “Medication Aide.”

An individual seeking certification as a medication aide shall apply to the board of nursing on a form prescribed and provided by the board in writing or via online application. The individual shall also pay the applicable certification fee established by the board.

To be eligible to receive a medication aide certificate, an applicant shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Have completed the twelfth grade or its equivalent, or have successfully passed the test for and received a general equivalency diploma;

Be a nurse aide, duly certified under the standards established under federal law and title 68, chapter 11, part 2, who has practiced as a certified nurse aide in a nursing home or assisted care living facility or a PACE as defined in § 56-2-121 for a minimum of one (1) year at the time the applicant submits an application for certification as a medication aide;

Have successfully completed the course of instruction provided by a training program approved by the board under subsection (i); and

Have passed a standardized examination.

If an applicant meets the requirements of subsection (e), the board shall issue a medication aide certificate to the applicant.

A medication aide certificate is valid for two (2) years, unless it is earlier suspended or revoked. The certificate may be renewed in accordance with procedures specified in rules promulgated by the board under this section. To be eligible for renewal, an applicant shall pay a renewal fee established by the board and shall:

Have completed all continuing education or continued competency requirements, or both, necessary to maintain nurse aide certification under title 68, chapter 11, part 2, and the rules promulgated pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 2; and

Have completed a total of six (6) contact hours per year of continuing education; provided, that five (5) hours of the continuing education shall be in pharmacology provided by a licensed pharmacist or registered nurse.

The board has the power to deny, revoke, or suspend any certificate to practice as a medication aide or to otherwise discipline a certificate holder, including imposing civil monetary penalties, upon proof that the medication aide:

Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a certificate as a medication aide;

Is guilty of a crime;

Is addicted to alcohol or drugs to the degree of interfering with the medication aide's professional duties;

Is mentally incompetent;

Is unfit or incompetent by reason of negligence, habits, or other cause, including the following:

Intentionally or negligently causing physical or emotional injury to a patient;

The board shall provide or contract for the provision of standardized medication aide examination services by:

Publishing an annual schedule of examination schedules and sites;

Scheduling tests to be administered, except when no individual is scheduled to test at a particular test site;

Publishing the number of individuals passing and failing the exam on at least a quarterly basis;

Requiring the minimum passing grade to be eighty-five percent (85%) for the examination; and

Requiring individuals who fail any portion of the examination two (2) consecutive times to repeat the course of training as set forth in subsection (i) prior to taking the examination again.

In accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, the board shall have rulemaking authority to establish any necessary rules for the administration of this subsection (j).

Except for the prohibited medications and the methods of medication administration specified in subdivision (k)(3), a medication aide, who holds a current, valid medication aide certificate issued under this section, may administer medications to the residents of nursing homes or assisted care living facilities or to the participants of PACE that use medication aides pursuant to this section. A medication aide shall administer medications only pursuant to delegation by a licensed nurse.

A delegation of medication administration to a medication aide shall be carried out in accordance with the rules for nursing delegation adopted under this chapter by the board of nursing.

A medication aide may only administer medication after:

Each resident is evaluated by a licensed nurse on admission and after any change in status, acuity, or medication; and

The licensed nurse makes a determination that it is appropriate for the resident to receive medication by a medication aide.

In exercising the authority to administer medications pursuant to a nursing delegation, a medication aide may administer medications in any of the following categories:

Oral medications;

Topical medications; and

Any medications set forth in subdivision (k)(2)(A) or (k)(2)(B) prescribed with a designation authorizing or requiring administration on an as-needed basis, but only if a nursing assessment of the patient is completed by a nurse licensed under this title before the medication is administered.

A medication aide shall not:

Administer medications when administration would require a dosage decision or calculation;

Directly receive orders from a physician or other medication prescriber;

Administer barium or other contrast media;

Administer chemotherapeutic agents;

Administer rectal and vaginal medications;

Apply topical medications ordered for the treatment of pressure ulcers or skin grafts;

Change a dosage amount to adhere to a change in a physician's order;

Administer medications delivered by aerosol / nebulizers; or

Administer medications delivered by metered hand-held inhalers without a spacer.

A medication aide shall not, under any circumstances, administer medications by certain methods or routes, or both, as determined by rule. These methods or routes include, but are not limited to, the following:

Injection;

Intravenous;

Central lines;

Intrathecal;

Colostomy;

A surgically placed feeding tube, such as gastrostomy or jejunostomy;

Nasogastric;

Intradermal;

Urethral;

Epidural;

Endotracheal;

Intramuscular;

Subcutaneous; or

Nonmetered inhaler.

The board of nursing shall adopt rules to implement this section. These rules shall take effect no later than January 1, 2017. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The rules adopted to implement this section shall at a minimum establish or specify the following:

Fees, in an amount sufficient to cover the costs the board incurs in implementing this section;

Procedures for renewal of medication aide certificates;

Grounds for discipline of applicants or certificate holders, or both;

Standards for approval of peer support programs for the holders of medication aide certificates; and

Procedures for approval or denial of medication aide training programs.

A licensed nurse for the purpose of this section shall include a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, or either one.

Any nursing home or assisted care living facility licensed pursuant to title 68 or a PACE that uses one (1) or more medication aides to administer medications shall implement as part of its facility policy a plan for the tracking and recording of:

Any medication error; and

Any incident of opioid or benzodiazepine diversion.

The incidents of medication error and diversion of opioids and benzodiazepines shall be made available to duly appointed representatives of the department of health pursuant to § 68-11-210.

Failing to assist in maintaining a facility record for each patient that accurately reflects the medication administration by the medication aide or failure to maintain a record for each patient that accurately reflects the name and title of the aide providing care, or both;

Using or removing without authorization drugs, supplies, or equipment from any licensed nursing home, assisted care living facility, or Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) as defined in § 56-2-121;

Using any intoxicating beverage or illegally using any narcotic or dangerous drug while on duty in any licensed nursing home, assisted care living facility, or PACE;

Being under the influence of alcoholic beverages, or under the influence of drugs that impair judgment while on duty in any licensed nursing home, assisted care living facility, or PACE;

Impersonating another licensed or certified healthcare provider;

Having received a revocation, suspension, probation, or other discipline of a certificate to practice as a medication aide, or its equivalent, or as a certified nurse aide, by another state for any act or omission that would constitute grounds for the revocation, suspension, probation, or other discipline of a certificate in this state;

Practicing as a medication aide certified in this state on a lapsed certificate;

Aiding, abetting, or assisting an individual to violate or circumvent any law or duly promulgated rule intended to guide the conduct of any certified or licensed healthcare provider;

Exercising undue influence on a patient, including the promotion or sale of services, goods, appliances, or drugs in such a manner as to exploit the patient for financial gain of the medication aide or of a third party;

Discriminating in the rendering of services as it relates to race, age, sex, religion, national origin, or the condition of the patient;

Violating confidentiality of information or knowledge concerning the patient, except when required to do so by a court of law;

Failing to take appropriate action in safeguarding the patient from incompetent healthcare practices;

Failing to report, through proper channels, facts known to the individual regarding incompetent, unethical, or illegal practices of any healthcare provider;

Performing healthcare techniques or procedures without proper education and practice; or

Engaging in acts of dishonesty that relate to the practice of a medication aide;

Is convicted of any one (1) of the following crimes:

First degree murder, § 39-13-202;

Second degree murder, § 39-13-210;

Kidnapping, § 39-13-303;

Aggravated kidnapping, § 39-13-304;

Especially aggravated kidnapping, § 39-13-305;

Aggravated robbery, § 39-13-402;

Especially aggravated robbery, § 39-13-403;

Aggravated rape, § 39-13-502;

Rape, § 39-13-503;

Exploitation of an adult under § 39-14-111 [repealed]; or

Abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult under § 71-6-117;

Furnished or otherwise provided the board with false or incomplete information on an application for a certificate regarding the individual's criminal conviction record; or

Has violated or attempted to violate, or assisted in or abetted the violation of, or conspired to violate, this chapter, any duly promulgated rule, or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant to this chapter.

All disciplinary actions taken by the board under this section shall conform to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, and may be heard by a screening panel pursuant to § 63-7-115(c).

(1) A qualified entity seeking approval to provide a medication aide training program shall apply to the board of nursing on a form prescribed and provided by the board, along with the applicable fee established by the board.

The board shall approve the applicant described in subdivision (i)(1) if the applicant is a qualified entity, or a combination of qualified entities, and if the content of the course of instruction to be provided by the program meets the standards, specified by the board in rules promulgated under this section, and includes:

At least sixty (60) hours of instruction, consisting of forty (40) classroom hours and twenty (20) clinical hours. The standard minimum curriculum shall be determined by the board of nursing and shall include appropriate instruction to enable communication, attention to safety, knowledge of medications, and other factors as determined necessary by the board; and

A supervised clinical practice component that includes an approved medication aide training program sufficient to assure that students are prepared to administer medications as a medication aide in a safe and effective manner and that:

Consists of twenty (20) hours, including experience in tasks related to the administration of medication, and that is conducted under the direction and supervision of a licensed nurse;

Requires any licensed nursing home, assisted care living facility, or PACE participating in the training program to have a written agreement to provide licensed nurse supervision of the student; and

Requires supervision of a student engaged in medication administration by a licensed nurse.

The board may deny, suspend, or revoke the approval granted to the qualified entity of a medication aide training program for reasons specified in rules promulgated under this subsection (i). All actions taken by the board to deny, suspend, or revoke the approval of a training program shall conform to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 2009, ch. 403, § 2; 2010, ch. 926, § 1; 2014, ch. 949, § 7; 2016, ch. 1051, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1051, § 2 provided that notwithstanding the act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of the act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

§ 39-14-111, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 466, § 3, effective July 1, 2017. Similar provisions can be found in title 39, chapter 15, part 5.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. 2010 amendment adding subsection (m) clarifying that a licensed nurse for purposes of the section includes a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse or either one does not create a conflict with T.C.A. § 63-7-108 by creating an impermissible chain of supervision. OAG 10-65, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (5/10/10).

63-7-128. Certificate to practice as a registered nurse first assistant.

As used in this section, “registered nurse first assistant” means a person who:

Is licensed as a registered nurse in this state;

Is certified in perioperative nursing; or

Is certified as an advanced practice registered nurse; and

Is qualified by education and training to perform tasks involved in perioperative nursing, as determined by the board; and

Has successfully completed a registered nurse first assistant education program that meets the education standard of the Association of periOperative Registered Nurses for a registered nurse first assistant.

Registered nurses holding the education and practice credentials of a registered nurse first assistant may apply to the board of nursing for a certificate to practice as a registered nurse first assistant, including authorization to use the title “registered nurse first assistant” or the abbreviation “RNFA.” No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation or any other words, letters or signs to indicate that the person using the same is a registered nurse first assistant.

An applicant for a certificate to practice as a registered nurse first assistant shall pay an initial fee as set by the board as well as a biennial renewal fee as set by the board.

Acts 2014, ch. 953, § 1; 2019, ch. 326, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(2)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 326, § 2. July 1, 2020; provided, that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 8, 2019.